Utah statutes.
76-6-501.   Forgery -- Elements of offense -- "Writing" defined.
(1)  As used in this section, "writing" includes printing, electronic storage
or transmission, or any other method of recording valuable information
including forms such as:
(a)  checks, tokens, stamps, seals, credit cards, badges, trademarks, money,
and any other symbols of value, right, privilege, or identification;
(b)  a security, revenue stamp, or any other instrument or writing issued by a
government or any agency; or
(c)  a check, an issue of stocks, bonds, or any other instrument or writing
representing an interest in or claim against property, or a pecuniary interest
in or claim against any person or enterprise.
(2)  A person is guilty of forgery if, with purpose to defraud anyone, or with
knowledge that he is facilitating a fraud to be perpetrated by anyone, he:
(a)  alters any writing of another without his authority or utters the altered
writing; or
(b)  makes, completes, executes, authenticates, issues, transfers, publishes,
or utters any writing so that the writing or the making, completion,
execution, authentication, issuance, transference, publication, or utterance:
(i)  purports to be the act of another, whether the person is existent or
nonexistent;
(ii)  purports to be an act on behalf of another party with the authority of
that other party; or
(iii)  purports to have been executed at a time or place or in a numbered
sequence other than was in fact the case, or to be a copy of an original when
an original did not exist.
(3)  It is not a defense to a charge of forgery under Subsection (2)(b)(ii) if
an actor signs his own name to the writing if the actor does not have
authority to make, complete, execute, authenticate, issue, transfer, publish,
or utter the writing on behalf of the party for whom the actor purports to
act.
(4)  Forgery is a third degree felony.
